Utah statutes.
63F-1-105.   Appointment of executive director -- Compensation -- Authority.

(1)  The governor shall:

(a)  appoint the executive director with the consent of the Senate; and

(b)  establish the executive director's salary within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.

(2)  The executive director shall:

(a)  serve at the pleasure of the governor; and

(b)  exercise all powers given to and perform all duties imposed on the department.

